Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB305.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 29A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as allowed under the Kentucky Rules of Criminal Procedure, a person present during any part of a
grand jury proceeding shall not knowingly:
(a) Record any testimony or evidence presented during the proceeding; or
(b) Disclose or disseminate at any time, any evidence, testimony, or other information that the person
witnessed, read, or heard while present at a grand jury proceeding.
(2) This section shall not apply to a:
(a) Commonwealth's attorney or any person employed by a Commonwealth's attorney; or
(b) Peace officer;
while engaged in the performance of his or her official duties.
Section 2. KRS 29A.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any employer who violates[ subsection (1) or (2) of] KRS 29A.160(1) or (2) is guilty of a Class B
misdemeanor.
(2) Any willful violation of KRS 29A.010 to 29A.330 for which a penalty is not otherwise provided by statute
shall be punishable as a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) Any person who violates:
(a) Subsection (1)(a) of Section 1 of this Act shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor; or
(b) Subsection (1)(b) of Section 1 of this Act shall be guilty of a Class D felony;
unless the person is a public servant as defined in KRS 519.010, in which case the person shall be penalized
one (1) class more severely than provided under this subsection.
Section 3. This Act may be cited as the Crystal Rogers Act.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version